Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 7 Management and Disposal of Property

37-7-1.
Rental of acquired land pending application to public use.

The acquiring authority with the approval of the state properties committee is authorized, whenever title to land and other real property is acquired by the state by purchase, gift, devise, or condemnation, to rent the land or any building or buildings thereon not reserved by the vendor, donor, or devisor until the use of the land or the removal of the structures becomes necessary to the purpose for which the land or other real property is acquired. The amount to be charged for rental shall in each instance be approved by the state purchasing agent and the receipts therefor shall be deposited with the general treasurer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

37-7-1

; P.L. 1968, ch. 257, § 2.

37-7-2.
Use or sale of products of state owned land.

Whenever any clay, gravel, sand, rock, earth, mineral, or other natural resource obtained from the soil or water of state owned real property, or any outgrowth, harvest, crop, agricultural, fishery, or forestry product, or any other produce found in, produced from, or grown in the soil or water of state owned real property, or any other yield or issue of state owned real property, shall become available to the acquiring authority and shall not be required for use by it, the acquiring authority shall forthwith notify the state purchasing agent who may requisition the same or any part thereof for use by any other department, board, bureau, commission, or agency of the state, or may sell the products or any part thereof to the highest bidder at public sale after giving public notice thereof by having the notice posted in some suitable public place for at least two (2) full business days before the sale, or at a private sale for not less than its appraisal value, or may, with the approval of the state properties committee, dispose of the products in such other manner and upon such terms and conditions as may in his or her judgment be most advantageous to the public interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

37-7-2

.

37-7-3.
Reconveyance, lease, or sale of land acquired by condemnation.

Whenever in the opinion of the acquiring authority any land or other real property or interest therein taken by condemnation is no longer required for the purpose for which it was taken, the acquiring authority, with the approval of the state properties committee, may, with the consent of the person or persons from whom the land, property, or interest was obtained, or their heirs, successors, or assigns, convey the property or any part thereof, with or without suitable restrictions, by executing and recording a deed thereof. The deed shall be executed on behalf of the state by the acquiring authority, approved as to substance by the director of administration, and approved as to form by the attorney general. The recorded deed shall thereby revest the title to the land, property or interest therein to the persons, their heirs, successors, or assigns, in whom it was vested at the time of the taking, and the fair market value of the land or property or interest therein so conveyed at the time of the conveyance shall be considered in mitigation of damages in any proceedings instituted on account of the taking. Or, the acquiring authority, with the approval of the state properties committee, may lease or sell and convey the property, with or without suitable restrictions, for consideration not less than that paid for it by the acquiring authority or not less than its appraised value as determined by the state properties committee at the time of the leasing or selling, by executing and delivering a lease or deed thereof, which lease or deed shall be executed on behalf of the state by the acquiring authority, approved as to substance by the director of administration, and approved as to form by the attorney general; provided, however, the person or persons in whom the title to the land or property or interest therein was vested at the time it was acquired under the provisions of this chapter shall, if living, have the right to lease, purchase, or reinvest him or herself or themselves, as the case may be, of the land or property or interest therein before the property may be leased, sold, or conveyed as provided by this section. A prior right shall be conclusively presumed to have been waived in the event that a written offer to lease, sell, or convey the property, containing the terms and conditions of the offer, shall be sent by registered or certified mail to the last known address of the person or persons, and the offer shall not have been accepted within thirty (30) days from the date of the mailing. In the event the prior right to purchase or lease the land or real property shall be waived by the person or persons in whom the title to the land or property or interest therein was vested, the city or town wherein the land or property is situated shall have the second right to purchase or lease the land and property upon the same terms and conditions as the acquiring authority was willing to sell or lease the land or property to the vested person or persons thereof. A second right to purchase or lease the land or property shall be conclusively presumed to have been waived in the event a written offer to sell or lease the same, containing the terms of the offer, shall have been sent by registered or certified mail to the city or town clerk, as the case may be, wherein the land and property are situated and the offer shall not have been accepted within thirty (30) days from the date of the mailing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 16; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-7-3

; P.L. 1966, ch. 203, § 1.

37-7-4.
Land taken for improvements adjacent to roads.

Whenever land is taken for the establishing, laying out, widening, extending, or relocating of public highways, streets, places, parks, or parkways, the acquiring authority may take more land and property than is needed for actual construction; provided, however, that the additional land and property so acquired or taken shall be no more in extent than would be sufficient to form suitable building sites abutting on the public highway, street, place, park, or parkway. After so much of the land and property has been appropriated for the public highway, street, place, park, or parkway as is needed therefor, the remainder may be held and improved by the acquiring authority for any public purpose or purposes, or may, with the approval of the state properties committee, be sold or leased for value, with or without suitable restrictions, and in the case of any sale or lease, the person or persons from whom the remainder was taken shall have the first right to purchase or lease the property upon such terms as the acquiring authority, with the approval of the state purchasing agent, is willing to sell or lease the property. The first right to purchase or lease shall be conclusively presumed to have been waived in the event that a written offer to sell or lease the property, containing the terms of the offer, shall have been sent by registered or certified mail to the last known address of the person or persons from whom the remainder was taken and the offer shall not have been accepted within thirty (30) days from the date of the mailing, and provided further that in the event the person or persons from whom the land was originally purchased refuse or waive their right to repurchase, or lease the land or property, the city or town wherein the land is situated shall have the second right to purchase or lease the land and property upon the same terms and conditions as the acquiring authority was willing to sell or lease the land or property to the original owners thereof. A second right to purchase or lease the land or property shall be conclusively presumed to have been waived in the event a written offer to sell or lease the land or property, containing the terms of the offer, shall have been sent by registered or certified mail to the city or town clerk, as the case may be, wherein the land and property are situated and the offer shall not have been accepted within thirty (30) days from the date of the mailing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 17; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-7-4

; P.L. 1966, ch. 203, § 1.

37-7-5.
Lease or sale of land acquired by purchase, devise or gift — Permitting use by others.

The acquiring authority, with the approval of the state properties committee, is authorized and empowered to rent or lease for a period not exceeding ten (10) years with an option for one renewal for a further period of ten (10) years any land or other real property acquired by purchase, devise, or gift as may not for the time be required for public use in such manner and upon such terms and conditions as may, in the judgment of the state purchasing agent, be most advantageous to the public interest. Provided, however, that with the approval of the state properties committee, the Rhode Island board of governors for higher education may enter into ground leases for real property owned by the board for a period not exceeding ninety-nine (99) years with four (4) options for renewal for a further period of ninety-nine (99) years each for educational and other purposes consistent with the mission of the institution. The acquiring authority, with the approval of the state properties committee, is hereby authorized and empowered to sell land or property in whole, or in part, in such manner and upon such terms and conditions as may in the judgment of the state purchasing agent be most advantageous to the public interest, and convey the land or property by proper deed or instrument; provided, however, that the acquiring authority shall first offer the land or property for sale to the city or town wherein the land or property is situated at the fair market value of the property. A first right to purchase the land or property shall be conclusively presumed to have been waived in the event a written offer to sell the land or property, containing the terms of the offer, shall have been sent by registered or certified mail to the city or town clerk, as the case may be, wherein the land and property are situated and the offer shall not have been accepted within thirty (30) days from the date of the mailing. In the event that the city or town wherein the land or property is situated shall refuse to buy the property or land or waive its right to the first option to purchase, then, in that event the acquiring authority shall be at liberty to sell the land or property to the highest bidder at public sale after advertising the time, place, and conditions of the sale at least once a week for at least three (3) weeks preceding the sale in at least one newspaper published in the county in which the land or property is situated. The acquiring authority may at any time, with the approval of the governor, after notice to the state properties committee, permit the use of any land or property to the government of the United States or to any town or city within the state of Rhode Island, and may, if the governor declares the necessity therefor by reason of any emergency, allow the temporary use of the land or property to any person, persons, association, or corporation.

The acquiring authority is hereby authorized to execute proper deeds and other instruments of conveyance and demise for land or other real property sold or leased which deeds and instruments shall in each case be approved as to substance by the director of administration and as to form by the attorney general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

37-7-5

; P.L. 1966, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 57, § 1.

37-7-5.1.
Lease or sale of property to refunding bond authority — Proceeds — Restricted receipt account.

Whenever the state leases, sells, or conveys property, real, personal, or mixed to the refunding bond authority under the provisions of chapter 14 of this title, in connection with a project authorized under the provisions of chapter 14 of this title, all money received by the state from the lease, sale, or conveyance, shall, if requested in writing by the director of administration, be deposited by the state controller to a restricted receipt account. The money and interest or income earned from their investment shall be administered and used solely to meet the state’s obligation to the refunding bond authority in connection with the project. However, this section shall not prohibit or limit the state from appropriating such additional funds as may be necessary to carry out the lease arrangement with the refunding bond authority. Upon the termination of the state’s lease arrangement with the refunding bond authority and the transfer of the project to the state, any money remaining unexpended in the restricted receipt account shall be transferred to the state’s general fund for the general purposes of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 167, art. 28, § 1.

37-7-6.
Transfer of land between departments and agencies.

The governor, upon the request in writing of any interested general officer or the head of any department, board, bureau, commission, or agency of the state government, may execute a certificate transferring custody, control, and supervision over any land, and all buildings and improvements thereon and other real property, title to which is vested in the state of Rhode Island, or the title to which will be vested in the state upon completion of any condemnation or other proceeding then pending, from the department, board, bureau, commission, or agency exercising custody, control, or supervision to another department, board, bureau, commission, or agency of the state government.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

37-7-6

.

37-7-6.1.
Conveyances and grants to fire districts.

Every fire district shall have the power and authority to purchase and/or receive gratuitously any tangible personal property state surplus property made available for sale or gift by the state.

Any state chartered fire district whose electors have been authorized to assess and collect taxes may apply to any appropriate department, board, bureau, or other agency of this state for a grant of money to be expended on equipment or other property used in connection with and for the work of extinguishing fires and suppressing fire hazards. The department, board, bureau, or agency shall not require as a condition to awarding the grant that the fire district have the approval of its town or city council for the expenditure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 303, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 377, § 1.

37-7-7.
Filing, publication, and recording of transfers between departments and agencies — Costs.

The governor shall file the certificate referred to in §

37-7-6

with the secretary of state who shall place the certificate on file and who shall cause a true copy of the certificate to be published at least once in a newspaper published in the county in which the land or property is situated, and shall file a certified copy of the certificate for record in the office of the recorder of deeds or town clerk in the city or town where the land or property is situated. The date and hour of the filing of the certified copy shall be noted thereon, and the filing shall be deemed to constitute a transfer of the custody, control, and supervision over the land described therein in accordance with the provisions of the certificate as of the day and hour noted upon the certified copy. No fee shall be charged or collected for the filing or recording. The cost of the publication shall be borne by the department, board, bureau, commission, or agency to which custody, control, or supervision has been transferred.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

37-7-7

; P.L. 1982, ch. 380, § 1.

37-7-8.
Grant of easements and rights of way over acquired lands.

Whenever, in the opinion of the acquiring authority, an easement or right of way may be granted in land owned or held by the state without thereby jeopardizing the interests of the state, and the granting of the easement or right of way will be for the public good, the acquiring authority, with the approval of the state properties committee, is hereby authorized and empowered to grant the easement or right of way by proper instrument, approved as to substance by the director of administration and as to form by the attorney general, for such consideration, and in such manner and upon such terms and conditions as may, in the judgment of the state purchasing agent, be most advantageous to the public interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

37-7-8

.

37-7-9.
Concessions, leases, and licenses — Reports.

The acquiring authority, with the approval of the state properties committee, is authorized and empowered, when it shall serve the public purpose, to grant concessions in or to lease or license any land or building or structure, a part or portion of any governmental facility, public work, or public improvement for industrial or commercial purposes for a term or terms not exceeding in the aggregate in any one case twenty (20) years; provided, however, that real property, buildings, and facilities owned by the state at the Port of Galilee may be leased for a term of up to forty (40) years for commercial fishing industry-related purposes; and provided further, however, that certain real property, buildings, and facilities owned by the state located on Indian Point with a 2012 address of 25 India Street in the city of Providence may be leased for a term of up to forty (40) years for commercial, public recreation, marina, and redevelopment purposes; provided, however, that real property, buildings, and facilities owned by the department of environmental management may be leased for a term not to exceed forty (40) years for the purpose of facilitating private investment in buildings or infrastructure for public recreation, or to develop or sustain a natural resource-based industry and where the useful life of the investment exceeds twenty-five (25) years; and provided further, however, that certain real properties, buildings, and facilities owned by the state in the city of Providence known as the Union Station properties, which properties have been conveyed from time to time to the state by the consolidated rail corporation and others, may be leased for a term of up to forty (40) years for office, commercial, service, transportation, or other related purposes; and provided further, however, that real property, buildings, and facilities owned by the state may be leased for a term of up to forty (40) years for the development of cogeneration projects which involve the simultaneous generation of electricity and thermal energy (steam and hot water) and for eligible renewable energy resources as defined in § 39-26-5(a)(i) through (v); and further provided, however, that in the event of a mobile home lease agreement or site lease agreement, wherein such mobile home is contiguous to a resident-owned mobile home park, the state properties committee may enter into a lease or grant concessions to or license any land or building for a period not to exceed thirty (30) years; and provided further, however, that real property, buildings, and facilities owned by the state may be leased for a term of up to ninety-nine (99) years for the development of railroad layover facilities, contingent on the lease requiring the lessee to provide commuter rail service within the state of Rhode Island, as set forth by the state; and provided further, however, that real property, buildings, and facilities owned by the state at the Quonset state airport may be leased to the United States Air Force for a term not to exceed forty (40) years for the purpose of making improvements to infrastructure thereon. All agreements, contracts, and other instruments granting concessions or leasing or licensing facilities shall contain such conditions, rules, restrictions, and regulations as the state purchasing agent shall deem suitable or necessary and shall be approved, as to substance, by the director of administration, and, as to form, by the attorney general.

Whenever property that is subject to the provisions of this chapter is leased by the state, the lessee shall report on a semi-annual basis the amount of income revenue generated by the leased property. The report shall be made to the state properties commission and copies shall be provided to both the house and senate fiscal staffs and the governor. These requirements shall be contained in the lease between the lessor and the lessee with approval of the state properties committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

37-7-9

; P.L. 1979, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 258, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 39, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 236, § 4; P.L. 2006, ch. 237, § 4; P.L. 2006, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 451, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 457, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 112, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 242, § 1.

37-7-10.
Vesting of title in successor to public office.

Upon the resignation, death, or removal from office for any cause of any governmental official, appointed or elected under the laws of this state or the laws of the United States of America, the title to all real estate and interest in real estate vested in or owned by the official in his or her governmental capacity or by virtue of his or her office, shall vest, transfer, and pass to his or her duly elected or appointed successor in office.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 488, § 6; P.L. 1951, ch. 2765, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-7-10

.

37-7-11.
Delegation of powers over real estate by federal officer.

Any governmental official duly appointed or elected under the laws of the United States of America, who by law is authorized to take and hold title to real estate by virtue of his or her office, may if authorized by the laws of the United States of America, by power of attorney duly executed, acknowledged, and recorded, delegate to any of his or her subordinates, the power to manage, contract to sell, sell, mortgage, or lease any real estate so held by him or her and to execute, acknowledge, and deliver in the name of the official any deed, conveyance, mortgage, lease, or other instrument necessary to effectuate the contract, sale, mortgage, or lease.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 488, § 7; P.L. 1951, ch. 2765, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-7-11

.

37-7-12.
Use of Indian meetinghouse in Charlestown.

The right to use and occupy for purposes of religious worship the Indian meetinghouse in Charlestown and the lot of land containing about two (2) acres upon which the meetinghouse stands, together with a suitable right of way leading to and from the lot of land and the nearest highway, to be laid out, bounded, and defined by the board of commissioners of the Indian tribe appointed under the provisions of chapter 800 of the public laws passed March 31, 1880, is granted to the religious society now occupying the meetinghouse during such time as they shall use the same for the purposes of religious worship.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 199, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 250, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 294, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 646, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-7-12

.

37-7-13.
Surplus group homes.

Any group home purchased or built by the state of Rhode Island and licensed pursuant to house §

40.1-24-3

, which is no longer used to house persons with disabilities and is vacant for a period of one year must be offered for sale on the private housing market forthwith and shall thereafter remain under the jurisdiction of the zoning enforcement officer and the zoning code of that municipality in which the home is located. The zoning enforcement officer and zoning code shall govern the use thereof. The group home shall not acquire any rights of a nonconforming use.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 307, § 5; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 83; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 83.

37-7-14.
Topsoil conservation.

Any alteration on state owned land, or any alteration funded by the state which requires the alteration of topsoil shall require the use of “compost amended soil” which meets the United States Department of Agriculture classification criteria of silt loam, sandy loam, loamy sand, or loam with a minimum of at least two percent (2%) organic matter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 347, § 1.

37-7-15.
Sale of state-owned land, buildings and improvements thereon and other real property.

Total annual proceeds from the sale of any land and the buildings and improvements thereon, and other real property, title to which is vested in the state of Rhode Island or title to which will be vested in the state upon completion of any condemnation or other proceedings, shall be transferred to and made available for the purposes outlined in §

42-11-2.5

, unless otherwise prohibited by federal law.

Provided, however, this shall not include proceeds from the sale of any land and the buildings and improvements thereon that will be created by the relocation of interstate route 195, which is sometimes collectively referred to as the “I-195 Surplus Land,” which land is identified in the “Rhode Island Interstate 195 Relocation Surplus Land: Redevelopment and Market Analysis” prepared by CKS Architecture & Urban Design dated 2009, and such term means those certain tracts or parcels of land situated in the city of Providence, county of Providence, state of Rhode Island, delineated on that certain plan of land captioned “Improvements to Interstate Route 195, Providence, Rhode Island, Proposed Development Parcel Plans 1 through 10, Scale: 1”

Subject to the approval of the director of the department of administration, the state controller is authorized to offset any currently recorded outstanding liability on the part of developmental disability organizations (DDOs) to repay previously authorized startup capital advances against the proceeds from the sale of group homes within a fiscal year prior to any sale proceeds being deposited into the information technology investment fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 26, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 7, § 12.